Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-516
Failure to satisfy judgment; nonresidents.

Whenever any person fails within sixty days to satisfy any judgment, it shall be the duty of the clerk of the court, or of the judge of a court which has no clerk, in which any such judgment is rendered within this state to transmit to the department, immediately after the expiration of sixty days, a copy of such judgment. If the defendant named in any copy of a judgment transmitted to the department is a nonresident, the department shall transmit a certified copy of the judgment to the official in charge of the issuance of licenses and registration certificates of the state of which the defendant is a resident.

Laws 1949, c. 178, § 16, p. 491;

Laws 1991, LB 420, § 14.